Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2402
Definitions, where
found.

For purposes of the Nursing Home Administrator
Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-2403 to 38-2416 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 817;

Laws 2013, LB42, § 2.